Wisconsin, session 2025, AB405.
do enact as follows:AB405,11Section 1. 118.019 (2m) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB405,2,52118.019 (2m) (e) Provides instruction in parental responsibility, including the 3importance of secure interpersonal relationships for infant mental health and the 4value of reading to young children for mental development, and the socioeconomic 5benefits of marriage for adults and their children.AB405,26Section 2. 118.019 (2m) (f) of the statutes is renumbered 118.019 (2m) (f) 7(intro.) and amended to read:AB405,2,98118.019 (2m) (f) (intro.) Explains pregnancy, prenatal development, and 9childbirth., and includes all of the following:AB405,310Section 3. 118.019 (2m) (f) 1. and 2. of the statutes are created to read:AB405,2,1611118.019 (2m) (f) 1. A high-definition ultrasound video showing the 12development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal 13development and a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation 14showing the process of fertilization and every stage of human development inside 15the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for 16every week of pregnancy until birth.AB405,3,212. A presentation on each trimester of pregnancy as it relates to the physical 2and emotional health of the mother.AB405,3,33